Utah statutes.
63G-7-601.   Actions governed by Utah Rules of Civil Procedure -- Undertaking required.

(1)  An action brought under this chapter shall be governed by the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure to the extent that they are consistent with this chapter.

(2)  At the time the action is filed, the plaintiff shall file an undertaking in a sum fixed by the court that is:

(a)  not less than $300; and

(b)  conditioned upon payment by the plaintiff of taxable costs incurred by the governmental entity in the action if the plaintiff fails to prosecute the action or fails to recover judgment.

